District of Columbia statutes.
16-710

Suspension of imposition or execution of sentence.

(a)

Except as provided in subsection (b), in criminal cases in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, the court may, upon conviction, suspend the imposition of sentence or impose sentence and suspend the execution thereof, or impose sentence and suspend the execution of a portion thereof, for such time and upon such terms as it deems best, if it appears to the satisfaction of the court that the ends of justice and the best interest of the public and of the defendant would be served thereby. In each case of the imposition of sentence and the suspension of the execution thereof, or the imposition of sentence and the suspension of the execution of a portion thereof, the court may place the defendant on probation under the control and supervision of a probation officer. The probationer shall be provided by the clerk of the court with a written statement of the terms and conditions of his probation at the time when he is placed thereon. He shall observe the rules prescribed for his conduct by the court and report to the probation officer as directed. A person may not be put on probation without his consent.

(b)

The period of probation referred to in subsection (a), together with any extension thereof, shall not exceed 5 years.

(b-1)

The court may order as a condition of probation for any defendant convicted of a felony that the defendant remain in custody or in a community correctional center during nights, weekends, or other intervals totaling not more than one year during the term of probation.

(c)

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to supersede the provisions of section 22-1804a.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 559, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 557, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(d)(6)
Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-202,§ 3, 30 DCR 173
Aug. 2, 1983, D.C. Law 5-24, § 2, 30 DCR 3341
June 8, 2001, D.C. Law 13-302, § 3, 47 DCR 7249

History

This section is referenced in § 24-468.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 16-710.
1973 Ed., § 16-710.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 13-302 added subsec. (b-1).

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see §§ 3 and 11 of the Sentencing Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-462, November 7, 2000, 47 DCR 9443).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of Sentencing Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-2, February 2, 2001, 48 DCR 2239).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of Sentencing Reform Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-51, May 2, 2001, 48 DCR 4370).

Emergency Legislation